District of Columbia statutes.
11-744

Judicial conference.

The chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall summon biennially or annually the active associate judges of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals and the active judges and magistrate judges of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to a conference at a time and place that the chief judge designates, for the purpose of advising as to means of improving the administration of justice within the District of Columbia. The chief judge shall preside at such conference which shall be known as the Judicial Conference of the District of Columbia. Every judge and magistrate judge summoned shall attend, and, unless excused by the chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, shall remain throughout the conference. The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall provide by its rules for representation of and active participation by members of the District of Columbia Bar and other persons active in the legal profession at such conference.

History

Dec. 31, 1975, 89 Stat. 1102, Pub. L. 94-193, § 1(a)
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(8), 108 Stat. 713
Dec. 12, 2012, 126 Stat. 1611, Pub. L. 112-229, § 2(a)

Cross References

Court administration, chief judges, responsibilities, see § 11-1702.
Superior Court, family division, exclusive jurisdiction, see § 11-1101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-744.
1973 Ed., § 11-744.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by Pub. L. 112-229, in the first sentence, substituted “biennially or annually” for “annually” and added “and magistrate judges”; and in the third sentence, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Courts of Appeals” and added “and magistrate judge”.